Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-8607
Notice required.

Any written contract, repair estimate, or work order prepared by a residential contractor to provide goods or services to be paid from the proceeds of a property and casualty insurance policy shall include the following notice of the prohibition contained in section 44-8604 in capitalized fourteen-point type which shall be signed by the named insured and sent to the named insured's insurer prior to payment of proceeds under the applicable insurance policy:

IT IS A VIOLATION OF THE INSURANCE LAWS OF NEBRASKA TO REBATE ANY PORTION OF AN INSURANCE DEDUCTIBLE AS AN INDUCEMENT TO THE INSURED TO ACCEPT A RESIDENTIAL CONTRACTOR'S PROPOSAL TO REPAIR DAMAGED PROPERTY. REBATE OF A DEDUCTIBLE INCLUDES GRANTING ANY ALLOWANCE OR OFFERING ANY DISCOUNT AGAINST THE FEES TO BE CHARGED FOR WORK TO BE PERFORMED OR PAYING THE INSURED HOMEOWNER THE DEDUCTIBLE AMOUNT SET FORTH IN THE INSURANCE POLICY.

THE INSURED HOMEOWNER IS PERSONALLY RESPONSIBLE FOR PAYMENT OF THE DEDUCTIBLE. THE INSURANCE FRAUD ACT AND NEBRASKA CRIMINAL STATUTES PROHIBIT THE INSURED HOMEOWNER FROM ACCEPTING FROM A RESIDENTIAL CONTRACTOR A REBATE OF THE DEDUCTIBLE OR OTHERWISE ACCEPTING ANY ALLOWANCE OR DISCOUNT FROM THE RESIDENTIAL CONTRACTOR TO COVER THE COST OF THE DEDUCTIBLE. VIOLATIONS MAY BE PUNISHABLE BY CIVIL OR CRIMINAL PENALTIES.

Laws 2018, LB743, § 34.

Insurance Fraud Act, see section 44-6601.